Utah statutes.
62A-3-104.2.   Contracts for services.

When an area agency has established a plan to provide services authorized by this chapter, and those services meet standards fixed by rules of the board, the area agency may enter into a contract with the division for services to be furnished by that area agency for an agreed compensation to be paid by the division.



Amended by Chapter 254, 1998 General Session

